Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 1211.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless a contrary meaning is required by the context:

“Crematory establishment” means a business registered with the Office conducted at a specific street address or location devoted to the disposition of dead human bodies by means of cremation, alkaline hydrolysis, or any other type of human reduction acceptable to the Director as established by the Director by rule.

“Director” means the Director of the Office of Professional Regulation.

“Funeral director” means a licensed person who is the owner, co-owner, employee, or manager of a licensed funeral establishment and who, for compensation, engages in the practice of funeral service.

“Funeral establishment” means a business registered with the Office conducted at a specific street address or location devoted to the practice of funeral service, and includes a limited services establishment.

“Office” means the Office of Professional Regulation.

“Practice of funeral service” means arranging, directing, or providing for the care, preparation, or disposition of dead human bodies for a fee or other compensation. This includes:

meeting with the public to select a method of disposition or funeral observance and merchandise;

entering into contracts, either at-need or pre-need, for the provision of dispositions, funeral observances, and merchandise;

arranging, directing, or performing the removal or transportation of a dead human body;

securing or filing certificates, permits, forms, or other documents;

supervising or arranging a funeral, memorial, viewing, or graveside observance;

holding oneself out to be a licensed funeral director by using the words or terms “funeral director,” “mortician,” “undertaker,” or any other words, terms, title, or picture that, when considered in context, would imply that such person is engaged in the practice of funeral service or is a licensed funeral director.

“Removal” means the removal of dead human bodies from places of death, hospitals, institutions, or other locations, for a fee or other compensation.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit:

cemetery owners, associations, or their employees from engaging in any functions normally performed by them in the course of their everyday affairs as allowed by 18 V.S.A. chapter 121;

the University of Vermont from engaging in functions normally performed by it in the course of receiving anatomical gifts for research or education, provided that embalming and removal of dead human remains are performed by persons licensed or registered under this chapter;

immediate family members of the deceased from providing for the care, preparation, or disposition of dead human bodies; or

religious or spiritual persons directly authorized by the immediate family members or authorized person of the deceased from providing for the care or preparation of dead human bodies without compensation.

Notwithstanding this section, crematory owners and their personnel may engage in the listed activities in subsection (a) of this section only to the extent such functions are necessary to the performance of their duties. Specifically, crematory personnel may:

provide for the disposition of dead human bodies by cremation, and meet with the public to arrange and provide for the disposition;

enter into contracts, without taking prepaid funds, for the provision of dispositions by cremation;

arrange, direct, or perform the removal or transportation of a dead human body, so long as removals are performed by licensed removal personnel; and

secure and file certificates, permits, forms, or other documents.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 224

, § 3;

1995, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 1a;

1999, No. 52

, § 12;

2001, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. June 27, 2002;

2013, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 1212.
Advisor appointees; Director duties; rules.

The Secretary of State shall appoint four persons for five-year staggered terms to serve at the Secretary’s pleasure as advisors in matters relating to funeral service. Three of the initial appointments shall be for four-, three-, and two-year terms. Appointees shall include three licensed funeral directors, one of whom is a licensed embalmer and one of whom has training or experience in the operation of crematoria. One appointee shall be a public member.
(a) (1) The Secretary of State shall appoint four persons for five-year staggered terms to serve at the Secretary’s pleasure as advisors in matters relating to funeral service. Three of the initial appointments shall be for four-, three-, and two-year terms. Appointees shall include three licensed funeral directors, one of whom is a licensed embalmer and one of whom has training or experience in the operation of crematoria. One appointee shall be a public member.

The Director shall seek the advice of the advisor appointees in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

The Director shall:

adopt rules establishing requirements for facilities used for embalming and preparation of dead human bodies, including the use of universal precautions. Rules adopted under this subdivision shall be submitted to the Commissioner of Health before the proposed rule is filed with the Secretary of State under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25;

adopt rules governing professional standards, standards for disclosure of prices, and a description of the goods and services that will be provided for those prices not inconsistent with Federal Trade Commission regulations regarding funeral industry practices and unfair or deceptive business practices;

provide general information to applicants for licensure;

explain appeal procedures to licensees and applicants and complaint procedures to the public;

issue licenses to qualified applicants under this chapter; and

adopt rules regarding:

minimum standards for crematory establishments, including standards for permits and documentation, body handling, containers, infectious diseases, pacemakers, body storage, sanitation, equipment and maintenance, dealing with the public, and other measures necessary to protect the public; and

the transaction of business as the Director deems necessary.

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

1973, No. 236

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1991, No. 219

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 28, 1992;

1995, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1997, No. 40

, § 22;

2001, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. June 27, 2002;

2005, No. 27

, § 38;

2009, No. 35

, § 16;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 1212a.
Repealed. 2005, No. 27, § 117(1).

§ 1213.
Inspection of premises.

The Director or his or her designee may, at any reasonable time, inspect funeral and crematory establishments.

Each funeral and crematory establishment shall be inspected at least once every two years. Copies of the inspector’s report of inspections of establishments shall be provided to the Director.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

1973, No. 236

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1995, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2001, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. June 27, 2002;

2005, No. 27

, § 39;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 1214.
Repealed. 2001, No. 151 (Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 1215.
Penalties; jurisdiction of offenses.

A person who engages in the practice of funeral services without a license shall be subject to the penalties provided in

3 V.S.A. § 127

.

A person shall not embalm or introduce any fluid into a dead human body unless the person is a licensed embalmer or is an apprentice and performs under the direction of an embalmer in his or her presence. A person who is not duly licensed as provided in this chapter shall not practice or hold himself or herself out to the public as a practicing embalmer; a person who does so shall be subject to the penalties provided in

3 V.S.A. § 127

.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 194

, § 10, operative Feb. 1, 1967;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

1995, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2007, No. 29

, § 24;

2009, No. 35

, § 17;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 1216.
Construction.

Nothing herein shall be construed as meaning that a licensed funeral establishment shall not have the right to prepare at the residence or place of death or some place approved by the local board of health a dead human body for burial.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent a funeral director licensed in another state from performing the duties of a funeral director in this State provided a licensed funeral director in this State is granted similar powers in such other state.